Utah statutes.
59-12-211.1.   Location of a transaction that is subject to a use tax.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), a person that is required by Subsection 59-12-107(2)(e) to pay a use tax on a transaction shall report the location of that transaction at the person's location.

(2)  For purposes of Subsection (1), if a person has more than one location in this state, the person shall report the location of the transaction at the location at which tangible personal property, a product transferred electronically, or a service is received.

